Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,113
Easement; release or transfer.

(1) A conservation or preservation easement may be released by the holder of the easement to the owner of the servient estate, except that such release shall be approved by the governing body which approved the easement, or if the holder is the state, a state agency, or political subdivision other than a city, village, or county, the release shall be approved by the state or such state agency or political subdivision. The release of an easement may be approved upon a finding by such body that the easement no longer substantially achieves the conservation or preservation purpose for which it was created.

(2) A conservation or preservation easement may be assigned or transferred to any governmental body or charitable corporation or trust authorized to secure such easement pursuant to sections 76-2,111 to 76-2,118.

Laws 1981, LB 173, § 3.